Massachusetts, session 194th, S200.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 87T of chapter 112 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the definition of “Board” and inserting in
place thereof the following definition:-
“Board”, the board of registration of cosmetology and barbering established in section 42
of chapter 13.
SECTION 2. Section 87BB of said chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out the fifth paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
The board may establish rules and regulations as necessary for the proper conduct of
schools, instructor qualifications, courses of study, hours of study and standards of professional
of 3

training; provided, however, that the board shall require a school that teaches cosmetology to
require enrolled students to complete at least 1 hour of domestic violence and sexual assault
awareness training as approved by the board.
SECTION 3. Said chapter 112 is hereby further amended by inserting after section 87DD
the following section:-
Section 87DD1/2. The board shall, in consultation with the attorney general, make
available on their website a sample sign to persons owning a shop, school or mobile business
engaged in cosmetology, which shall be displayed in such shop, school or mobile business in a
conspicuous manner that is clearly visible to patrons and employees.
The sign shall be not less than 8 ½ inches high and 11 inches wide and shall contain the
following notice:
“WARNING. Obtaining forced labor or services is a crime under Massachusetts law. If
you or someone you know is being forced to engage in any activity using threats, harm, or
restraint – whether it is commercial sex, housework, farm work or any other activity – call the
National Human Trafficking Hotline: 1-888-373-7888. You can remain anonymous, and the
Hotline is available 24 hours a day, 7 days a week.”
The notice text shall be provided on the sample sign in English, Spanish, Chinese,
Vietnamese, Portuguese and any other language recommended by the board. Annually, the
board, in consultation with the attorney general, shall determine if the sample sign should be
made available in any other language.
of 3

SECTION 4. Section 87JJ of said chapter 112, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out the third paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following
paragraph:-
The board may establish rules and regulations as necessary for the conduct of post-
secondary institutions, qualifications of instructors, courses of study, hours of study and
standards of professional training; provided, however, that the board shall require a post-
secondary institution that teaches cosmetology to require enrolled students to complete at least 1
hour of domestic violence and sexual assault awareness training as approved by the board.
SECTION 5. Chapter 258C of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 13 the following section:-
Section 13A. No licensee, student or regular student under sections 87T to 87KK,
inclusive, of chapter 112, or the employer of such licensee, student or regular student, who has
completed at least of 1 hour of domestic violence and sexual assault awareness training as
approved by the board of registration of cosmetology and barbering shall be: (i) criminally liable
for acting in good faith or failing to act on information obtained during the course of
employment in a cosmetology practice or enrollment in a school as defined in said section 87T of
said chapter 112 concerning alleged domestic violence or sexual assault; or (ii) civilly liable for
damages as a result of acts or omissions in providing or obtaining in good faith, or attempting to
provide or obtain, such assistance or enrollment unless such acts or omissions constitute willful,
wanton or reckless conduct.
of 3